Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-234
Violation; penalty.

A violation of the Telemarketing and Prize Promotions Act is a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 1999, LB 469, § 13;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-2013;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 96.